Illinois, session 104th, HB500.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Transportation Benefits Program Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 63/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Transportation Benefits Program Act.9(Source: P.A. 103-291, eff. 1-1-24.)